District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.15

Accident report — Confidential.

Repealed.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 124, ch. 222, § 15
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-415.
1973 Ed., § 40-431.